Idaho, session 2025, H0367.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 73, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 6, Title 73, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 6
HUMAN PERSONHOOD ACT
73-601. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Human Personhood Act."
73-602. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Conception" means the joining of a human sperm cell and human egg,
whether through natural or artificial means, in the act of fertilization
that results in the forming of a living human zygote.
(2) "Human being" means a member of the Homo sapien species, from the
moment of conception until death.
(3) "Personhood" means the state or fact of being a human being, made
in the image of God, and thus endowed by the Creator with the unalienable
rights, among which is the inherent right to life.
73-603. HUMAN PERSONHOOD. (1) The state of Idaho recognizes that exis-
tence of a human being begins at the moment of conception and that at the mo-
ment of conception every living preborn child possesses full personhood and
the rights and facts that accompany personhood.
(2) It shall be the policy of this state and its political subdivisions
to cherish and protect the right to life of every human being.
(3) The laws of this state shall be interpreted and construed to ac-
knowledge, on behalf of the preborn child at every stage of development, all
the rights, privileges, and immunities available to other persons, citi-
zens, and residents of this state.
(4) Neither this state, nor any jurisdiction thereof, shall make any
law, rule, or policy that denies or undermines the personhood or inherent
right to life of any preborn child.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as creating a cause of
action against a woman for indirectly harming her preborn child by failing to


properly care for herself or by failing to follow any particular program of
prenatal care.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.